Idaho, session 2026, H0740.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 57-723A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
57-723A. DEPOSIT AND DISTRIBUTION OF EARNINGS RESERVE FUNDS -- INCOME
FUNDS -- ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS. (1) As directed by the state board of land
commissioners, the investment board shall distribute the earnings from the
investments or securities in accordance with this act and the laws governing
the respective endowment funds. Earnings from the investment of permanent
endowment funds related to state land grants shall be deposited into each en-
dowment's respective earnings reserve fund for distribution as provided in
this section.
(2) At least annually, the state board of land commissioners shall dis-
tribute moneys constituting earnings reserve funds, in excess of the amount
necessary to pay administrative costs, to the income funds of the respec-
tive endowments, to each endowment's respective permanent endowment fund or
maintained as a free fund balance in the earnings reserve funds, in amounts
to be determined by the state board of land commissioners.
(3) The earnings intended to support the beneficiaries of the public
school endowment shall be distributed by special distribution from the state
department of education on a per-pupil basis using the average daily atten-
dance calculation in section 33-1003A, Idaho Code, to a school district, as
defined in section 33-1001, Idaho Code, for each student in kindergarten
through grade 12 who receives a majority of his or her instruction at a physi-
cal facility that is owned or leased by the school district or public charter
school.
(3) (4) Moneys in the earnings reserve funds shall be available for ap-
propriation by the legislature to pay for administrative costs incurred man-
aging the assets of the endowments including, but not limited to, real prop-
erty and monetary assets.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.